Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Oregon Criminal Justice Commission,  for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General Fund, the amount of $77,371,810.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $603,177
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140 to the Oregon Criminal Justice  Commission, for veterans’ specialty
courts.
SECTION 3.
Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$15,643,216 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or  received by the Oregon Criminal
Justice Commission.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$13,307,548 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Oregon  Criminal Justice
Commission.
SECTION 5. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 1
Passed by Senate June 16, 2023
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 22, 2023
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 5505 (SB 5505-A) Page 2